North Carolina, session 2025, SB784.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 50B-1(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) For purposes of this section, the term "personal relationship" means a relationship
wherein the parties involved:involved either:
(1) Are current or former spouses;spouses.
(2) Are persons of opposite sex who live together or have lived together;together.
(3) Are related as parents and children, including others acting in loco parentis to
a minor child, or as grandparents and grandchildren. For purposes of this
subdivision, an aggrieved party may not obtain an order of protection against
a child or grandchild under the age of 16;16.
(4) Have a child in common;common.
(5) Are current or former household members;members.
(6) Are persons of the opposite sex who are in a dating relationship or have been
in a dating relationship. For purposes of this subdivision, a dating relationship
is one wherein the parties are romantically involved over time and on a
continuous basis during the course of the relationship. A casual acquaintance
or ordinary fraternization between persons in a business or social context is
not a dating relationship."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to establish a public awareness and prevention campaign
regarding domestic violence within same-sex relationships.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to domestic
violence protection orders issued on or after that date.
*S784-v-1*